Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 29
UNIVERSITY OF IDAHO — FEDERAL EDUCATIONAL AID

Section.

33-2901. Assent to Morrill acts.

The assent of the legislature of the state of Idaho is hereby given to all the provisions of an act of Congress, approved July 2, 1862, entitled, “An act donating public lands to the several states which may provide colleges for the benefit of agriculture and the mechanic arts,” and the acts amendatory thereof and supplementary thereto.

33-2902. Assent to Hatch act.

The assent of the legislature of the state of Idaho is hereby given to all the provisions of an act of Congress, approved March 2, 1887, entitled, “An act to establish agricultural experimental stations in connection with the colleges established in the several states under the provisions of an act approved July 2, 1862, and the acts supplemental thereto,” and the acts amendatory thereof and supplementary thereto.

33-2903. Assent to Adams act.

The assent of the legislature of the state of Idaho shall be, and the same is hereby, given to all the provisions of an act of Congress, approved March 16, 1906, entitled, “An act to provide for an increased annual appropriation for agricultural experiment stations and regulating the expenditures thereof.” And the legislature of the state of Idaho hereby approves of, and assents to, the purposes of the grants and appropriations provided for and made by said act of Congress, and hereby agrees to abide by the terms, conditions, requirements and limitations thereof.

33-2904. Assent to Smith-Lever act.

The assent of the legislature of the state of Idaho is given to the provisions and requirements of an act of Congress, approved May 8, 1914, entitled, “An act to provide for the cooperative agricultural extension work between the agricultural colleges in the several states receiving the benefits of the act of Congress approved July 2, 1863, and of acts supplementary thereto, and the United States department of agriculture.” The state board of education and board of regents of the University of Idaho are authorized and empowered to receive the grants of money appropriated under such act, and to organize and conduct agricultural extension work which shall be carried on in connection with the terms and conditions expressed in the act of Congress aforesaid; and the treasurer of the state board of education and board of regents of the University of Idaho is hereby designated as the officer to whom all moneys granted to the state of Idaho under said act shall be paid.

33-2905. Assent to Purnell act — Agricultural experimentation.

The assent of the legislature of the state of Idaho is hereby given to all provisions and requirements of an act of Congress approved February 24, 1925, commonly known as “The Purnell Act” and entitled “An act to authorize more complete endowment of agricultural experimentation and for other purposes,” and the acts amendatory thereof and supplementary thereto.

33-2906. Purnell act — Receipt and expenditure of appropriations.

The regents of the University of Idaho are authorized and empowered to receive any grants of money appropriated under such act and to expend the same in accordance with the terms, conditions, requirements, and limitations of said act, and the treasurer of the regents of the university is hereby designated as the officer to whom all moneys granted to the state of Idaho under said act shall be paid.

33-2907. Purnell act — Continuing appropriation of moneys received.

All moneys accruing or accrediting to, and which may be received for and on account of said act are hereby perpetually appropriated and set apart for the support and maintenance of the work contemplated in the aforementioned act of Congress.

33-2908. Assent to act of May 22, 1928 — Agricultural extension work.

The state of Idaho hereby assents to the provisions and requirements of an act of Congress approved May 22, 1928, entitled “An act to provide for the further development of agricultural extension work between the agricultural colleges in the several states receiving the benefits of the act entitled ‘An act donating public lands of the several states and territories which may provide colleges for the benefit of agriculture and the mechanic arts’ approved July 2, 1862, and all acts supplementary thereto, and the United States Department of Agriculture”; and hereby authorizes the state board of education and board of regents of the University of Idaho to receive the grants of money appropriated under said act and to organize and conduct agricultural extension work which shall be carried on in connection with the college of agriculture of the state university in accordance with the terms and conditions expressed in the said act of Congress.

33-2909. University permanent endowment fund.

There is established in the state treasury the university permanent endowment fund. This fund is perpetually appropriated for the beneficiaries of the endowment. The fund shall be managed and invested by the endowment fund investment board according to law and the policies established by the state board of land commissioners. The fund principal shall forever remain intact. The fund shall be a permanent fund and shall consist of the following:

Proceeds from the sale of any lands granted to the state of Idaho by the United States government for university purposes under the provisions of the act of congress of February 18, 1881, entitled “An act to grant lands to Dakota, Montana, Arizona, Idaho and Wyoming for university purposes,” as amended by the Idaho Admission Bill 26 Stat. L. 215, ch. 656, and lands granted in lieu of university lands;

Proceeds of royalties arising from the extraction of minerals on university endowment lands owned by the state;

Moneys allocated from the university earnings reserve fund.

Proceeds from the sale of university endowment lands may be first deposited into the land bank fund established in section 58-133, Idaho Code, for the benefit of endowment beneficiaries. If the proceeds from the sale of land are not used to acquire other lands in accordance with section 58-133, Idaho Code, the land sale proceeds shall be deposited into the university permanent endowment fund along with any earnings on the proceeds.

Earnings from the investment of the university permanent endowment fund shall be distributed according to the provisions of section 57-723A, Idaho Code.

33-2909A. University earnings reserve fund.

There is established in the state treasury the university earnings reserve fund. The fund shall be managed and invested by the endowment fund investment board according to law and the policies established by the state board of land commissioners. The fund shall consist of the following:

All earnings from the university permanent endowment fund;

Proceeds of the sale of timber growing upon university endowment lands;

Proceeds of leases of university endowment lands;

Proceeds of interest charged upon deferred payments on university endowment lands or on timber on those lands; and

All other proceeds received from the use of university endowment lands and not otherwise designated for deposit in the university permanent endowment fund.

Moneys shall be distributed out of the university earnings reserve fund only to support the beneficiaries of the university endowment, including distributions by the state board of land commissioners to the university permanent endowment fund and the university income fund; provided, that funds shall not be appropriated by the legislature from the university earnings reserve fund except to pay for administrative costs incurred managing the assets of the university endowment including, but not limited to, real property and monetary assets.

33-2910. University income fund.

There is established in the state treasury the university income fund. The fund shall consist of all moneys distributed from the university earnings reserve fund and from other sources as the legislature deems appropriate. Moneys in the university income fund shall be used for the benefit of beneficiaries of the university endowment and distributed to current beneficiaries of the endowment pursuant to legislative appropriation.

33-2911. Scientific school permanent endowment fund.

There is established in the state treasury the scientific school permanent endowment fund. This fund is perpetually appropriated for the beneficiaries of the endowment. The fund shall be managed and invested by the endowment fund investment board according to law and the policies established by the state board of land commissioners. The fund principal shall forever remain intact. The fund shall be a permanent fund and shall consist of the following:

Proceeds of the sale of lands granted to the state of Idaho by the United States government under the provisions of the Idaho Admission Bill, 26 Stat. L. 215, ch. 656, known as scientific school endowment lands, and those granted in lieu of such lands;

Proceeds of royalties arising from the extraction of minerals on scientific school endowment lands owned by the state;

Moneys allocated from the scientific school earnings reserve fund.

Proceeds from the sale of scientific school endowment lands may be first deposited into the land bank fund established in section 58-133, Idaho Code, to be used to acquire other lands within the state for the benefit of beneficiaries of the scientific school endowment. If the land sale proceeds are not used to acquire other lands in accordance with section 58-133, Idaho Code, the proceeds shall be deposited into the scientific school permanent endowment fund along with any earnings on the proceeds.

Earnings from the investment of the scientific school permanent endowment fund shall be distributed according to the provisions of section 57-723A, Idaho Code.

33-2911A. Scientific school earnings reserve fund.

There is established in the state treasury the scientific school earnings reserve fund. The fund shall be managed and invested by the endowment fund investment board according to law and the policies established by the state board of land commissioners. The fund shall consist of the following:

All earnings of the scientific school permanent endowment fund;

Proceeds of the sale of timber on scientific school endowment lands;

Proceeds of leases of scientific school lands;

Proceeds of interest charged upon deferred payments on scientific school endowment lands or on timber on those lands; and

All other proceeds received from the use of scientific school endowment lands and not otherwise designated for deposit in the scientific school permanent endowment fund.

Moneys shall be distributed out of the scientific school earnings reserve fund only to support the beneficiaries of the scientific school endowment, including distributions by the state board of land commissioners to the scientific school permanent endowment fund and the scientific school income fund; provided, that funds shall not be appropriated by the legislature from the scientific school earnings reserve fund except to pay for administrative costs incurred managing the assets of the scientific school endowment including, but not limited to, real property and monetary assets.

33-2912. Scientific school income fund.

There is established in the state treasury the scientific school income fund. The fund shall consist of all moneys distributed from the scientific school earnings reserve fund and from other sources as the legislature deems appropriate. Moneys in the scientific school income fund shall be used for the benefit of the beneficiaries of the endowment and distributed to current beneficiaries of the scientific school endowment pursuant to legislative appropriation.

33-2913. Agricultural college permanent endowment fund.

There is established in the state treasury the agricultural college permanent endowment fund. This fund is perpetually appropriated for the beneficiaries of the endowment. The fund shall be managed and invested by the endowment fund investment board according to law and the policies established by the state board of land commissioners. The fund principal shall forever remain intact. The fund shall be a permanent fund and shall consist of the following:

Proceeds of the sale of agricultural college endowment lands granted to the state of Idaho by the United States government under the provisions of the Idaho Admission Bill, 26 Stat. L. 215, ch. 656;

Proceeds of royalties arising from the extraction of minerals on agricultural college endowment lands owned by the state;

Moneys allocated from the agricultural college earnings reserve fund.

Proceeds from the sale of agricultural college endowment lands may be first deposited into the land bank fund established in section 58-133, Idaho Code, to be used to acquire other lands within the state for the benefit of beneficiaries of the agricultural college endowment. If the land sale proceeds are not used to acquire other lands in accordance with section 58-133, Idaho Code, the proceeds shall be deposited into the agricultural college permanent endowment fund along with any earnings on the proceeds.

Earnings from the agricultural college permanent endowment fund shall be distributed according to the provisions of section 57-723A, Idaho Code.

33-2913A. Agricultural college earnings reserve fund.

There is established in the state treasury the agricultural college earnings reserve fund. The fund shall be managed and invested by the endowment fund investment board according to law and the policies established by the state board of land commissioners. The fund shall consist of the following:

All earnings of the agricultural college permanent endowment fund;

Proceeds of the sale of timber growing on agricultural college endowment lands;

Proceeds of leases of agricultural college endowment lands;

Proceeds of interest charged upon deferred payments on agricultural college endowment lands or on timber on those lands; and

All other proceeds received from the use of agricultural college endowment lands and not otherwise designated for deposit in the agricultural college permanent endowment fund.

Moneys shall be distributed out of the agricultural college earnings reserve fund only to support the beneficiaries of the agricultural college endowment, including distributions by the state board of land commissioners to the agricultural college permanent endowment fund and the agricultural college income fund; provided, that funds shall not be appropriated by the legislature from the agricultural college earnings reserve fund except to pay for administrative costs incurred managing the assets of the agricultural college endowment including, but not limited to, real property and monetary assets.

33-2914. Agricultural college income fund.

There is established in the state treasury the agricultural college income fund. The fund shall consist of all moneys distributed from the agricultural college earnings reserve fund and from other sources as the legislature deems appropriate. Moneys in the agricultural college income fund shall be used for the benefit of the beneficiaries of the endowment and distributed to current beneficiaries of the agricultural college endowment pursuant to legislative appropriation.